Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TRAFFICKING AND SEXUAL EXPLOITATION PREVENTION FOR YOUTH.new text end new text begin $125,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Office of Justice Programs to issue a grant to Citizens Against Sex Trafficking to be used to address youth trafficking and sexual exploitation in the Twin Cities metropolitan area through the Power Over Predators prevention program. Citizens Against Sex Trafficking must expand the Power Over Predators youth trafficking prevention services to youth, parents, and the community by working with youth groups, recovery support groups, domestic violence support groups, and the Ramsey County correctional facility to provide victim-centered and trauma-informed support, awareness, and education to prevent youth trafficking, sexual violence, and exploitation in Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end